Illinois, session 104th, HB26.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/7)7    Sec. 7. Attendance by a means other than physical 8presence.9    (a) If a quorum of the members of the public body is 10physically present as required by Section 2.01, a majority of 11the public body may allow a member of that body to attend the 12meeting by other means if the member is prevented from 13physically attending because of: (i) personal illness or 14disability; (ii) employment purposes or the business of the 15public body; (iii) a family or other emergency; or (iv) 16unexpected childcare obligations. "Other means" is by video or 17audio conference.18    (b) If a member wishes to attend a meeting by other means, 19the member must notify the recording secretary or clerk of the 20public body before the meeting unless advance notice is 21impractical.22    (c) A majority of the public body may allow a member to 23attend a meeting by other means only in accordance with and to   HB0026- 2 -LRB104 03132 BDA 13153 b1the extent allowed by rules adopted by the public body. The 2rules must conform to the requirements and restrictions of 3this Section, may further limit the extent to which attendance 4by other means is allowed, and may provide for the giving of 5additional notice to the public or further facilitate public 6access to meetings. 7    (d) The limitations of this Section shall not apply to (i) 8closed meetings of (A) public bodies with statewide 9jurisdiction, (B) Illinois library systems with jurisdiction 10over a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square 11miles, (C) municipal transit districts with jurisdiction over 12a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, or 13(D) local workforce innovation areas with jurisdiction over a 14specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles or 15(ii) open or closed meetings of State advisory boards or 16bodies that do not have authority to make binding 17recommendations or determinations or to take any other 18substantive action. State advisory boards or bodies, public 19bodies with statewide jurisdiction, Illinois library systems 20with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 214,500 square miles, municipal transit districts with 22jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 234,500 square miles, and local workforce investment areas with 24jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 254,500 square miles, however, may permit members to attend 26meetings by other means only in accordance with and to the   HB0026- 3 -LRB104 03132 BDA 13153 b1extent allowed by specific procedural rules adopted by the 2body. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce 3innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 4areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal 5Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 6legislation. 7    (e) Subject to the requirements of Section 2.06 but 8notwithstanding any other provision of law, an open or closed 9meeting subject to this Act may be conducted by audio or video 10conference, without the physical presence of a quorum of the 11members, so long as the following conditions are met:12        (1)(A) the Governor or the Director of the Illinois 13    Department of Public Health has issued a disaster 14    declaration related to public health concerns because of a 15    disaster as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois Emergency 16    Management Agency Act, and all or part of the jurisdiction 17    of the public body is covered by the disaster area; or 18        (B) the National Weather Service has determined that 19    all or part of the jurisdiction of the public body is 20    located within an area that is subject to a severe weather 21    alert on the day of the meeting; 22        (2) the head of the public body as defined in 23    subsection (e) of Section 2 of the Freedom of Information 24    Act determines that an in-person meeting or a meeting 25    conducted under this Act is not practical or prudent 26    because of a disaster or severe weather alert;  HB0026- 4 -LRB104 03132 BDA 13153 b1        (3) all members of the body participating in the 2    meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be 3    verified and can hear one another and can hear all 4    discussion and testimony;5        (4) for open meetings, members of the public present 6    at the regular meeting location of the body can hear all 7    discussion and testimony and all votes of the members of 8    the body, unless attendance at the regular meeting 9    location is not feasible due to the disaster, including 10    the issued disaster declaration, in which case the public 11    body must make alternative arrangements and provide notice 12    pursuant to this Section of such alternative arrangements 13    in a manner to allow any interested member of the public 14    access to contemporaneously hear all discussion, 15    testimony, and roll call votes, such as by offering a 16    telephone number or a web-based link;17        (5) at least one member of the body, chief legal 18    counsel, or chief administrative officer is physically 19    present at the regular meeting location, unless unfeasible 20    due to the disaster, including the issued disaster 21    declaration, or severe weather alert; and22        (6) all votes are conducted by roll call, so each 23    member's vote on each issue can be identified and 24    recorded; .25        (7) except Except in the event of a bona fide 26    emergency, 48 hours' notice is shall be given of a meeting   HB0026- 5 -LRB104 03132 BDA 13153 b1    to be held pursuant to this Section. Notice shall be given 2    to all members of the public body, shall be posted on the 3    website of the public body, and shall also be provided to 4    any news media who has requested notice of meetings 5    pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act. If 6    the public body declares a bona fide emergency:7            (A) notice is Notice shall be given pursuant to 8        subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act, and the 9        presiding officer states shall state the nature of the 10        emergency at the beginning of the meeting; and .11            (B) the The public body complies must comply with 12        the verbatim recording requirements set forth in 13        Section 2.06 of this Act; .14        (8) each Each member of the body participating in a 15    meeting by audio or video conference for a meeting held 16    pursuant to this Section is considered present at the 17    meeting for purposes of determining a quorum and 18    participating in all proceedings; .19        (9) in In addition to the requirements for open 20    meetings under Section 2.06, public bodies holding open 21    meetings under this subsection (e) must also keep a 22    verbatim record of all their meetings in the form of an 23    audio or video recording. Verbatim records made under this 24    paragraph (9) shall be made available to the public under, 25    and are otherwise subject to, the provisions of Section 26    2.06; and .  HB0026- 6 -LRB104 03132 BDA 13153 b1        (10) the The public body bears shall bear all costs 2    associated with compliance with this subsection (e).3(Source: P.A. 103-311, eff. 7-28-23.)